Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,167.02
Alcoholic liquor; disqualification; appeal.

Any person who feels himself or herself aggrieved because of such disqualification pursuant to a hearing under section 60-4,167 may appeal to the district court of the county where the alleged violation occurred in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The appeal shall not suspend the disqualification unless a stay is allowed by the court pending a final determination of the review. If a stay is allowed and the final judgment of the court finds against the person appealing, the period of disqualification shall commence at the time of the final judgment of the court for the full period of the time of disqualification.

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.